Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2531.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5104.1(a) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5104.1. Disarming law enforcement officer.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of disarming a law enforcement officer if he:(1) without lawful authorization, removes or attempts to remove a firearm, rifle, shotgun or weapon from the person of a law enforcement officer [or], corrections officer or school security guard, or deprives a law enforcement officer [or], corrections officer or school security guard of the use of a firearm, rifle, shotgun or weapon, when the officer or school security guard is acting within the scope of the officer's or 12345678910111213141516171819 school security guard's duties; and(2) has reasonable cause to know or knows that the individual is a law enforcement officer [or], corrections officer or school security guard.(b) Grading.--A violation of this section constitutes a felony of the third degree.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"School security guard." As defined in section 1301-C of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2531PN3432 - 2 - 12345678910111213